Utah statutes.
17B-2a-603.   Additional metropolitan water district powers.

In addition to the powers conferred on a metropolitan water district under Section 17B-1-103, a metropolitan water district may:

(1)  acquire or lease any real or personal property or acquire any interest in real or personal property, as provided in Subsections 17B-1-103(2)(a) and (b), whether inside or outside the district or inside or outside the state;

(2)  encumber real or personal property or an interest in real or personal property that the district owns;

(3)  acquire or construct works, facilities, and improvements, as provided in Subsection 17B-1-103(2)(d), whether inside or outside the district or inside or outside the state;

(4)  acquire water, works, water rights, and sources of water necessary or convenient to the full exercise of the district's powers, whether the water, works, water rights, or sources of water are inside or outside the district or inside or outside the state, and encumber, transfer an interest in, or dispose of water, works, water rights, and sources of water;

(5)  develop, store, and transport water;

(6)  provide, sell, lease, and deliver water inside or outside the district for any lawful beneficial use;

(7)  issue bonds as provided in and subject to Chapter 1, Part 11, Local District Bonds, to carry out the purposes of the district; and

(8)  subscribe for, purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire stock in a canal company, irrigation company, water company, or water users association, for the purpose of acquiring the right to use water or water infrastructure.

